Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXVI Statutory Actions and Limitations
Home Inspectors’ Opportunity to Cure

411.270.
Definitions for KRS 411.270 to 411.282.

As used in KRS

411.270

to

411.282

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Action” means any civil lawsuit or action in contract or tort for damages or indemnity brought against a home inspector to assert a claim, whether by complaint, counterclaim, or cross-claim, for damages or the loss of use of real or personal property caused by a deficient home inspection or home inspection report regarding the inspection of a home. “Action” does not include any civil action in tort alleging personal injury or wrongful death to a person or persons resulting from a deficient home inspection or home inspection report;

“Claimant” means a client who asserts a claim against a home inspector concerning a deficient home inspection or home inspection report regarding the inspection of a home;

“Home” means a structure consisting of at least one (1) but not more than four (4) units, each designed for occupancy by a single family, whether the units are occupied or unoccupied;

“Home inspector” means a person licensed in accordance with KRS

198B.700

to

198B.738

; and

“Serve” or “service” means personal service or delivery by certified mail to the last known address of the addressee.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 109, § 21, effective July 13, 2004.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/13/2004). In 2004 Ky. Acts ch. 109, sec. 21, directed that this section be created as a new section of KRS Chapter 21, the statute has been codified in KRS Chapter 411 because it is clear from the subject matter of this statute, the structure of ch. 109, and the range created by ch. 109, secs. 21 to 27, that placement in KRS Chapter 411 was intended. See KRS 7.136(1)(a) and (h).

(7/13/2004). In 2004 Ky. Acts ch. 109, sec. 21, subsec. 4, “home inspector” is defined as “a person licensed in accordance with Sections 1 to 27 of this Act.” Because the home inspector licensure provisions in ch. 109 are confined to Sections 1 to 20, and Sections 21 to 27 set forth notice and opportunity to repair procedures that must be followed prior to bringing an action for damages against a home inspector, the reference to Sections 1 to 27 in subsection (4) has been changed by the Reviser of Statutes to the statutes at which Sections 1 to 20 are codified. See KRS 7.136(1)(a) and (h).

411.272.
Scope of KRS 411.270 to 411.282.

KRS

411.270

to

411.282

shall:

Apply to any claim that arises before, on, or after July 15, 2004, as the result of a deficient home inspection or home inspection report regarding the inspection of a home, except a claim for personal injury or wrongful death, if the claim is the subject of an action commenced on or after July 15, 2004;

Prevail over any conflicting law otherwise applicable to the claim or cause of action;

Not bar or limit any claim or defense otherwise available except as otherwise provided in KRS

411.270

to

411.282

; and

Not create a new theory upon which liability may be based.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 109, § 22, effective July 13, 2004.

411.274.
Circumstances under which home inspector liable.

In a claim to recover damages resulting from a deficient home inspection or home inspection report regarding the inspection of a home, a home inspector is liable for his or her acts or omissions or the acts or omissions of his or her agents or employees and is not liable for any damages caused by:

The acts or omissions of a person other than the home inspector or his or her agent or employee; or

Any construction defect disclosed to a claimant before his or her purchase of the home, if the disclosure was provided in writing and in language that is understandable and was signed by the claimant.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 109, § 23, effective July 13, 2004.

411.276.
Written notice of claim required — Offer to remedy or settle — Acceptance or rejection of offer — Tolling of statute of limitations.

In every deficient home inspection or home inspection report action brought against a home inspector, the claimant shall serve written notice of claim on the home inspector. The notice of claim shall state that the claimant asserts a deficient home inspection or home inspection report claim against the home inspector and shall describe the claim in reasonable detail sufficient to determine the general nature of the deficiency.

Within twenty-one (21) days after service of the notice of claim, the home inspector shall serve a written response on the claimant by registered mail or personal service. The written response shall:

Propose to inspect the residence that is the subject of the claim and to complete the inspection within a specified time frame. The proposal shall include the statement that the home inspector shall, based on the inspection, offer to remedy the defect, compromise by payment, or dispute the claim;

Offer to compromise and settle the claim by monetary payment without inspection; or

State that the home inspector disputes the claim.

If the home inspector disputes the claim or does not respond to the claimant’s notice of claim within the time stated in subsection (2) of this section, then the claimant may bring an action against the home inspector for the claim described in the notice of claim without further notice.

If the claimant rejects the inspection proposal or the settlement offer made by the home inspector pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, then the claimant shall serve written notice of the claimant’s rejection on the home inspector. After service of the rejection, the claimant may bring an action against the home inspector for the deficient home inspection or home inspection report claim described in the notice of claim. If the home inspector has not received from the claimant, within thirty (30) days after the claimant’s receipt of the home inspector’s response, either an acceptance or a rejection of the inspection proposal or settlement offer, then at any time thereafter the home inspector may terminate the proposal or offer by serving written notice to the claimant, and the claimant may thereafter bring an action against the home inspector for the deficient home inspection or home inspection report claim described in the notice of claim.

If the claimant elects to allow the home inspector to inspect in accordance with the home inspector’s proposal pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section, then the claimant shall provide the home inspector reasonable access to the claimant’s home during normal working hours to inspect the premises.

Within fourteen (14) days following completion of the inspection, the home inspector shall serve on the claimant:

A written offer to remedy the defect at no cost to the claimant, including a report of the scope of the inspection, the findings and results of the inspection, a description of the remedy necessary to cure the defect described in the claim, and a timetable for the completion of this remedy;

A written offer to compromise and settle the claim by monetary payment pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section; or

A written statement that the home inspector will not proceed further to remedy the defect.

The claimant shall have the right to accept or reject the proposed remedy, or the monetary offer to settle the claim.

If the home inspector does not proceed further to remedy the defect within the agreed timetable, or if the home inspector fails to comply with the provisions of paragraph (b) of this subsection, then the claimant may bring an action against the home inspector for the claim described in the notice of claim without further notice.

If the claimant rejects the offer made by the home inspector pursuant to paragraph (b)1. or 2. of this subsection to either remedy the defect or to compromise and settle the claim by monetary payment, then the claimant shall serve written notice of the claimant’s rejection on the home inspector. After service of the rejection notice, the claimant may bring an action against the home inspector for the deficient home inspection or home inspection report claim described in the notice of claim. If the home inspector has not received from the claimant, within thirty (30) days after the claimant’s receipt of the home inspector’s response, either an acceptance or a rejection of the offer made pursuant to paragraph (b)1. or 2. of this subsection, then at any time thereafter the home inspector may terminate the offer by serving written notice to the claimant.

Any claimant accepting the offer of a home inspector to remedy the defect pursuant to subsection (4)(b)1. of this section shall do so by serving the home inspector with a written notice of acceptance within a reasonable time period after receipt of the offer, and no later than thirty (30) days after receipt of the offer. The claimant shall provide the home inspector reasonable access to the claimant’s home during normal working hours to perform and complete the remedy by the timetable stated in the offer.

The claimant and home inspector may, by written mutual agreement, alter the extent of remedy or the timetable, including but not limited to repair of additional defects.

If a claimant files a complaint, counterclaim, or cross-claim prior to meeting the requirements of this section, then the court may issue an order holding the action in abeyance until the parties comply with this section.

Nothing in this section may be construed to prevent a claimant from commencing an action on the deficient home inspection or home inspection report claim described in the notice of claim if the home inspector fails to perform the remedy agreed upon or fails to perform by the timetable agreed upon pursuant to subsection (2)(a) or (5) of this section.

The service of an amended notice of claim shall relate back to the original notice of claim for purposes of tolling statutes of limitations and repose.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 109, § 24, effective July 13, 2004.

411.278.
Notice of home inspector’s right to cure before commencement of litigation — Action not barred if home inspector fails to give notice.

The home inspector shall, upon entering into a contract for the inspection of a building or residence, provide notice to each client of the home inspector’s right to offer to cure a deficient home inspection or home inspection report before a client may commence litigation against the home inspector. The notice shall be conspicuous and may be included as part of the underlying contract signed by the client.

The notice required by this section shall be in substantially the following form: “CHAPTER 411 OF THE KENTUCKY REVISED STATUTES CONTAINS IMPORTANT REQUIREMENTS YOU MUST FOLLOW BEFORE YOU MAY FILE A LAWSUIT FOR DEFECTIVE CONSTRUCTION AGAINST THE HOME INSPECTOR OF YOUR RESIDENCE. YOU MUST DELIVER TO YOUR HOME INSPECTOR A WRITTEN NOTICE OF ANY CONDITIONS YOU ALLEGE THAT YOUR HOME INSPECTOR FAILED TO INCLUDE IN THE HOME INSPECTION REPORT AND PROVIDE YOUR HOME INSPECTOR THE OPPORTUNITY TO MAKE AN OFFER TO REPAIR OR PAY FOR THE DEFECTS. YOU ARE NOT OBLIGATED TO ACCEPT ANY OFFER MADE BY THE HOME INSPECTOR. THERE ARE STRICT DEADLINES AND PROCEDURES UNDER STATE LAW, AND FAILURE TO FOLLOW THEM MAY AFFECT YOUR ABILITY TO FILE A LAWSUIT.”

KRS

411.270

to

411.282

shall not preclude or bar any action if notice is not given to the client as required by this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 109, § 25, effective July 13, 2004.

411.280.
Construction of KRS 411.270 to 411.282.

Nothing in KRS

411.270

to

411.282

shall be construed to hinder or otherwise affect the employment, agency, or contractual relationship between and among homeowners and home inspectors during the process of inspection, and nothing in KRS

411.270

to

411.282

precludes the termination of those relationships as allowed under other law.

Noncompliance by the client with KRS

411.276

shall not operate as an affirmative defense in an action against a home inspector by the client for emergency repairs.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 109, § 26, effective July 13, 2004.

411.282.
Effect of notice of claim on statute of limitations.

If a written notice of claim is served under KRS

411.276

, then the statute of limitation for the underlying action is tolled until seventy-five (75) days after the expiration of the time frame agreed to by the parties under KRS

411.276

(2), or the date established for inspection pursuant to KRS 411.276(2)(a), or the expiration of the time frame contained in KRS 411.276(4)(b), whichever occurs later.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 109, § 27, effective July 13, 2004.